Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2794.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Department of
Commerce from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Progressing Rural Economic Prosperity Fund created pursuant to
Section 256 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes the sum of Five
Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary to provide funding for a municipal park located in a
Req. No. 13801 Page 1

coun ty with a population greater than seven hundred fifty thousand
(750,000) according to the latest Federal Decennial Census and north
of I-344 and west of I-35.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Department of
Commerce from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Progressing Rural Economic Prosperity Fund created pursuant to
Section 256 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes the sum of Four
Million Dollars ($4,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary to relocate a naval submarine located east of State
Highway 165 and north of State Highway 62.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Department of
Commerce from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Progressing Rural Economic Prosperity Fund created pursuant to
Section 256 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes the sum of One
Million Eight Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,800,000.00) or so much
thereof as may be necessary to implement infrastructure improvements
at an industrial park located south of State Highway 62 and east of
State Highway 283.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.

Req. No. 13801 Page 2

SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-13801 JM 05/19/25


















Req. No. 13801 Page 3